District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1806.08f

Tax on residents and nonresidents — Credits — Targeted historic housing credit — Cap; administrative costs.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 302(b)(2), 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2212(b), 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 4, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2302, 54 DCR 7052

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-33, rewrote section, which had read:
“The Mayor may approve up to $1,250,000 of credits under § 47-1806.08a each fiscal year from fiscal year 2003 through fiscal year 2006.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2212(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4 of Targeted Historic Preservation Assistance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-500, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 9046).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle M of title II of Law 16-33: Section 2211 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle M of title II of the act may be cited as the Targeted Historic Housing Tax Credit Act of 2005.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 17-20, § 2302, made a technical correction in the repeal of this section by D.C. Law 16-294, § 4.